District of Columbia statutes.
2-273.01

Requests for information.

(a)

Before beginning a competitively bid solicitation process in accordance with § 2-273.04, the Office may issue a request for information to obtain information regarding potential public-private partnership projects.

(b)

A request for information shall be published in a manner that gives interested parties sufficient public notice, time, and opportunity to respond.

(c)

Any response to a request for information shall be the property of the Office.

(d)

A private entity's response to a request for information shall have no effect on the evaluation or selection of that private entity for a public-private partnership agreement.

Mar. 11, 2015, D.C. Law 20-228, § 106, 62 DCR 261

History